Wisconsin, session 2025, AB487.
do enact as follows:AB487,11Section 1. 13.53 (2m) of the statutes is created to read:AB487,2,7213.53 (2m) Information technology security. The committee shall 3periodically prepare and publish a summary of the information technology security 4issues considered by the committee in closed session under s. 19.85 (1) (i). The 5committee shall make sufficient alterations in the summary to prevent disclosing 6confidential, proprietary, and other sensitive information contained in records 7described under s. 19.36 (17).AB487,28Section 2. 13.58 (5) (a) 6. of the statutes is created to read:AB487,2,13913.58 (5) (a) 6. Periodically prepare and publish a summary of the 10information technology security issues considered by the committee in closed 11session under s. 19.85 (1) (i). The committee shall make sufficient alterations in the 12summary to prevent disclosing confidential, proprietary, and other sensitive 13information contained in records described under s. 19.36 (17).AB487,314Section 3. 19.36 (17) of the statutes is created to read:AB487,3,21519.36 (17) Records regarding information technology security. Unless 16access is specifically authorized or required by statute, an authority shall not 17provide access under s. 19.35 (1) to records regarding information technology 18security issues that are considered in closed session under s. 19.85 (1) (i), except 19that an authority may provide such records to the joint committee on information 1policy and technology and the joint legislative audit committee for consideration 2under s. 19.85 (1) (i).AB487,43Section 4. 19.85 (1) (i) of the statutes is created to read:AB487,3,8419.85 (1) (i) Consideration of information technology security issues affecting 5information technology systems over which the investment board, ethics 6commission, elections commission, joint committee on information policy and 7technology, or joint legislative audit committee have jurisdiction or exercise 8responsibility.AB487,59Section 5. 19.851 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB487,3,181019.851 (1) Prior to convening under this section or under s. 19.85 (1), the 11ethics commission and the elections commission shall vote to convene in closed 12session in the manner provided in s. 19.85 (1). The ethics commission shall identify 13the specific reason or reasons under sub. (2) and s. 19.85 (1) (a) to (h) (i) for 14convening in closed session. The elections commission shall identify the specific 15reason or reasons under s. 19.85 (1) (a) to (h) (i) for convening in closed session. No 16business may be conducted by the ethics commission or the elections commission at 17any closed session under this section except that which relates to the purposes of 18the session as authorized in this section or as authorized in s. 19.85 (1).AB487,3,1919